California statutes. Penal Code
In order to ensure the effective delivery of comprehensive services to victims and witnesses, a center established by an agency receiving funds pursuant to this article shall carry out all of the following activities in connection with both primary and optional services:

(a) Translation services for non-English-speaking victims and witnesses or the deaf or hard of hearing.

(b) Follow-up contact to determine whether the client received the necessary assistance.

(c) Field visits to a client’s home, place of business, or other location, whenever necessary to provide services.

(d) Service to
 victims and witnesses of all types of crime.

(e) Volunteer participation to encourage community involvement.

(f) Services for elderly victims of crime, appropriate to their special needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 199.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13835.5.

(a) Comprehensive services shall include all of the following primary services:

(1) Crisis intervention, providing timely and comprehensive responses to the individual needs of victims.

(2) Emergency assistance, directly or indirectly providing food, housing, clothing, and, when necessary, cash.

(3) Resource and referral counseling to agencies within the community which are appropriate to meet the victim’s needs.

(4) Direct counseling of the victim on problems resulting from the crime.

(5) Assistance in the processing, filing, and verifying of claims filed by victims of crime pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(6) Assistance in obtaining the return of a victim’s property held as evidence by law enforcement agencies, if requested.

(7) Orientation to the criminal justice system.

(8) Court escort.

(9) Presentations to and training of criminal justice system agencies.

(10) Public presentations and publicity.

(11) Monitoring appropriate court cases to keep victims and witnesses apprised of the progress and outcome of their case.

(12) Notification to friends, relatives, and employers of the occurrence of the crime and the victim’s condition, upon request of the victim.

(13) Notification to the employer of the victim or witness, if requested by the victim or witness, informing the employer that the employee was a victim of or witness to a crime and asking the employer to minimize any loss of pay or other benefits which may result because of the crime or the employee’s participation in the criminal justice system.

(14) Upon request of the victim, assisting in obtaining restitution for the victim, in ascertaining the victim’s economic loss, and in providing the probation department, district attorney, and court with information relevant to his or her losses prior to the imposition of sentence.

(b) Comprehensive services may include the following optional services, if their provision does not preclude the efficient provision of primary services:

(1) Employer intervention.

(2) Creditor intervention.

(3) Child care.

(4) Notification to witnesses of any change in the court calendar.

(5) Funeral arrangements.

(6) Crime prevention information.

(7) Witness protection, including arranging for law enforcement protection or relocating witnesses in new residences.

(8) Assistance in obtaining temporary restraining orders.

(9) Transportation.

(10) Provision of a waiting area during court proceedings separate from defendants and families and friends of defendants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 629, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13835.6.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services, in cooperation with representatives from local victim and witness assistance centers, shall develop standards defining the activities and services enumerated in this article.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services, in cooperation with representatives from local victim and witness assistance centers, shall develop a method of evaluating the activities and performance of centers established pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 446.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13835.7.

There is in the State Treasury the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund. Funds appropriated thereto shall be dispensed to the Office of Emergency Services exclusively for the purposes specified in this article, for any other purpose that supports victims, and for the support of the centers specified in Section 13837.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 28, Sec. 74.   (SB 854)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

13835.10.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) That the provision of quality services for victims of crime is of high priority.

(2) That existing victim service programs do not have sufficient financial resources to consistently recruit and employ fully trained personnel.

(3) That there is no consistency in the training provided to the various agencies serving victims.

(4) That comprehensive training for victim service agencies is geographically limited or unavailable.

(5) That there is currently no statewide comprehensive training system in place for the state to ensure that all service providers receive adequate training to provide quality services to victims of crime.

(6) It is the intention of the Legislature to establish a statewide training program within the Office of Emergency Services to provide comprehensive standardized training to victim service providers.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall establish a statewide victim-assistance training program, the purpose of which is to develop minimum training and selection standards, certify training courses, and provide funding to enable local victim service providers to acquire the required training.

(c)(1) For the purpose of raising the level of competence of local victim service providers, the Office of Emergency Services shall adopt guidelines establishing minimum standards of training for employees of victim-witness and sexual assault programs funded by the office to provide services to victims of crime. The Office of Emergency Services shall establish an advisory committee composed of recognized statewide victim service organizations, representatives of local victim service programs, and others selected at the discretion of the executive director to consult on the research and development of the training, selection, and equivalency standards.

(2) Any local unit of government, community-based organization, or any other public or private nonprofit
 entity funded by the Office of Emergency Services as a victim-witness or sexual assault program to provide services to victims of crime shall adhere to the training and selection standards established by the Office of Emergency Services. The standards for sexual assault victim service programs developed by the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 13836 shall be the standards for purposes of this section. With the exception of the sexual assault standards, the Office of Emergency Services shall conduct or contract with an appropriate firm or entity for research on validated standards pursuant to this section in consultation with the advisory committee established pursuant to paragraph (1). The Office of Emergency Services may defer the adoption of the selection standards until the necessary research is completed. Until the standards are adopted, affected victim service programs may
 receive state funding from the Office of Emergency Services upon certification of their willingness to adhere to the training standards adopted by the Office of Emergency Services.

(3) Minimum training and selection standards may include, but shall not be limited to, basic entry, continuation, supervisory, management, specialized curricula, and confidentiality.

(4) Training and selection standards shall apply to all victim service and management personnel of the victim-witness and sexual assault agencies funded by the Office of Emergency Services to provide services to victims of crime. Exemptions from this requirement may be made by the Office of Emergency Services. A victim service agency which, despite good faith efforts, is unable to meet the standards established pursuant
 to this section, may apply to the Office of Emergency Services for an exemption. For the purpose of exemptions, the Office of Emergency Services may establish procedures that allow for partial adherence. The Office of Emergency Services may develop equivalency standards which recognize professional experience, education, training, or a combination of the above, for personnel hired before July 1, 1987.

(5) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a victim service agency, funded by the Office of Emergency Services to provide services to victims of crime, from establishing training and selection standards which exceed the minimum standards established by the Office of Emergency Services pursuant to this section.

(d) For purposes of implementing this section, the Office of Emergency
 Services has all of the following powers:

(1) To approve or certify, or both, training courses selected by the agency.

(2) To make those inquiries which may be necessary to determine whether every local unit of government, community-based organization, or any other public or private entity receiving state aid from the Office of Emergency Services as a victim-witness or sexual assault program for the provision of services to victims of crime, is adhering to the standards for training
 and selection established pursuant to this section.

(3) To adopt those guidelines which are necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(4) To develop or present, or both, training courses for victim service providers, or to contract with coalitions, councils, or other designated entities, to develop or present, or both, those training courses.

(5) To perform other activities and studies necessary to carry out the intent of this section.

(e) (1) The Office of Emergency Services may utilize any funds that may become available from the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund to fund the cost of training staff of victim
 service agencies which are funded by the Office of Emergency Services from the fund. The Office of Emergency Services may utilize federal or other state funds that may become available to fund the cost of training staff of victim service agencies which are not eligible for funding from the Victim-Witness Assistance Fund.

(2) Peace officer personnel whose jurisdictions are eligible for training subvention pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13500) of Title 4 of this part and correctional or probation personnel whose jurisdictions are eligible for state aid pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6035) of Chapter 5 of Title 7 of Part 3 are not eligible to receive training reimbursements under this section unless the person receiving the training is assigned to provide victim services in accordance with a grant award agreement with
 the Office of Emergency Services and is attending training to meet the established standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 448.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Training of Sexual Assault Investigators [13836. - 13836.2.]

13836.

The Office of Emergency Services shall establish an advisory committee which shall develop a course of training for district attorneys in the investigation and prosecution of sexual assault cases, child sexual exploitation cases, child sexual abuse cases, and sexual abuse cases involving victims with developmental disabilities, and shall approve grants awarded pursuant to Section 13837. The courses shall include training in the unique emotional trauma experienced by victims of these crimes.

It is the intent of the Legislature in the enactment of this chapter to encourage the establishment of sex crime prosecution units, which shall include, but not be limited to, child sexual exploitation and child sexual abuse cases, in district attorneys’ offices throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.   (AB 640)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

13836.1.

The committee shall consist of 11 members. Five shall be appointed by the Director of Emergency Services, and shall include three district attorneys or assistant or deputy district attorneys, one representative of a city police department or a sheriff or a representative of a sheriff’s department, and one public defender or assistant or deputy public defender of a county. Six shall be public members appointed by the Commission on the Status of Women and Girls, and shall include one representative of a rape crisis center, and one medical professional experienced in dealing with sexual assault trauma victims. The committee members shall represent the points of view of diverse ethnic and language groups.

Members of
 the committee shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their expenses actually and necessarily incurred by them in the performance of their duties. Staff support for the committee shall be provided by the Office of Emergency Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 450.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13836.2.

(a) The office shall reimburse each county for the costs of salaries and transportation to the extent necessary to permit up to 10 percent of the staff of the district attorney to complete the course of training established pursuant to this chapter. The office shall prescribe the manner in which the training shall be obtained. The training shall be offered at least twice each year in both northern and southern California.

(b) The office shall seek certification from the State Bar of the course as a course which may be taken to complete the Criminal Law Specialist Certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1262, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Rape Victim Counseling Centers [13837. - 13838.]

13837.

(a) (1) The California Office of Emergency Services (Cal OES) shall provide grants to proposed and existing child sexual exploitation and child sexual abuse victim counseling centers and prevention programs, including programs for minor victims of human trafficking. Grant recipients shall provide appropriate in-person counseling and referral services during normal business hours, and maintain other standards or services that shall be determined to be appropriate by the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 13836 as grant conditions. The advisory committee shall identify the criteria to be utilized in awarding the grants provided by this chapter before any funds are allocated.

(2) In order to be eligible for funding pursuant to this
 chapter, the centers shall demonstrate an ability to receive and make use of any funds available from governmental, voluntary, philanthropic, or other sources that may be used to augment any state funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter. Each center receiving funds pursuant to this chapter shall make every attempt to qualify for any available federal funding.

(3) State funds provided to establish centers shall be utilized when possible, as determined by the advisory committee, to expand the program and shall not be expended to reduce fiscal support from other public or private sources. The centers shall maintain quarterly and final fiscal reports in a form to be prescribed by the administering agency. In granting funds, the advisory committee shall give priority to centers which are operated in close proximity to medical treatment facilities.

(b) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that a goal or purpose of the Cal OES is to ensure that all victims of sexual assault and rape receive comprehensive, quality services, and to decrease the incidence of sexual assault through school and community education and prevention programs.

(2) The Cal OES and the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 13836 shall collaboratively administer sexual assault/rape crisis center victim services programs and provide grants to proposed and existing sexual assault services programs (SASPs) operating local rape victim centers and prevention programs. All SASPs shall provide the services in subparagraphs (A) to (G), inclusive, and to the extent federal funding is made available, shall also provide the service described in subparagraph (H). The Cal OES shall provide financial and technical assistance to SASPs in implementing the following services:

(A) Crisis intervention, 24 hours per day, seven days per week.

(B) Followup counseling services.

(C) In-person counseling, including group counseling.

(D) Accompaniment services.

(E) Advocacy services.

(F) Information and referrals to victims and the general public.

(G) Community education presentations.

(H) Rape prevention presentations and self-defense programs.

(3) The funding process for distributing grant awards to SASPs shall be
 administered as follows:

(A) The Cal OES and the advisory committee established pursuant to Section 13836 shall collaboratively adopt each of the following:

(i) The process and standards for determining whether to grant, renew, or deny funding to any SASP applying or reapplying for funding under the terms of the program.

(ii) For SASPs applying for grants under the RFP process described in subparagraph (B), a system for grading grant applications in relation to the standards established pursuant to clause (i), and an appeal process for applications that are denied. A description of this grading system and appeal process shall be provided to all SASPs as part of the application required under the RFP process.

(iii) For SASPs reapplying for funding under
 the RFA process described in subparagraph (D), a system for grading the performance of SASPs in relation to the standards established pursuant to clause (i), and an appeal process for decisions to deny or reduce funding. A description of this grading system and appeal process shall be provided to all SASPs receiving grants under this program.

(B) Grants for centers that have previously not been funded or were not funded in the previous cycle shall be awarded as a result of a competitive request for proposal (RFP) process. The RFP process shall comply with all applicable state and federal statutes for sexual assault/rape crisis center funding, and to the extent possible, the response to the RFP shall not exceed 25 narrative pages, excluding attachments.

(C) Grants shall be awarded to SASPs that propose to maintain services previously granted funding pursuant to this section, to
 expand existing services or create new services, or to establish new sexual assault/rape crisis centers in underserved or unserved areas. Each grant shall be awarded for a three-year term.

(D) SASPs reapplying for grants are not subject to a competitive bidding grant process, but are subject to a request for application (RFA) process. The RFA process for a SASP reapplying for grant funds shall consist, in part, of an assessment of the past performance history of the SASP in relation to the standards established pursuant to subparagraph (A). The RFA process shall comply with all applicable state and federal statutes for sexual assault/rape crisis center funding, and to the extent possible, the response to the RFA shall not exceed 10 narrative pages, excluding attachments.

(E) Any SASP funded through this program in the previous grant cycle shall be funded upon reapplication, unless
 its past performance history fails to meet the standards established pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A).

(F) The Cal OES shall conduct a minimum of one site visit every three years for each agency funded to provide sexual assault/rape crisis centers. The purpose of the site visit shall be to conduct a performance assessment of, and provide subsequent technical assistance for, each center visited. The performance assessment shall include, but need not be limited to, a review of all of the following:

(i) Progress in meeting program goals and objectives.

(ii) Agency organization and facilities.

(iii) Personnel policies, files, and training.

(iv) Recordkeeping, budgeting, and
 expenditures.

(v) Documentation, data collection, and client confidentiality.

(G) After each site visit conducted pursuant to subparagraph (F), the Cal OES shall provide a written report to the SASP summarizing the performance of the SASP, any deficiencies noted, any corrective action needed, and a deadline for corrective action to be completed. The Cal OES shall also develop a corrective action plan for verifying the completion of corrective action required. The Cal OES shall submit its written report to the SASP no more than 60 days after the site visit. A grant under the RFA process shall not be denied if the SASP did not receive a site visit during the previous three years, unless the Cal OES is aware of criminal violations relative to the administration of grant funding.

(H) SASPs receiving written reports of
 deficiencies or orders for corrective action after a site visit shall be given no less than six months’ time to take corrective action before the deficiencies or failure to correct may be considered in the next RFA process. However, the Cal OES shall have the discretion to reduce the time to take corrective action in cases where the deficiencies present a significant health or safety risk or when other severe circumstances are found to exist. If corrective action is deemed necessary, and a SASP fails to comply, or if other deficiencies exist that, in the judgment of the Cal OES, cannot be corrected, the Cal OES shall determine, using its grading system, whether continued funding for the SASP should be reduced or denied altogether. If a SASP has been determined to be deficient, the Cal OES may, at any point during the SASP’s funding cycle following the expiration of the period for corrective action, deny or reduce further funding.

(I) If a SASP
 applies or reapplies for funding pursuant to this section and that funding is denied or reduced, the decision to deny or reduce funding shall be provided in writing to the SASP, along with a written explanation of the reasons for the reduction or denial made in accordance with the grading system for the RFP or RFA process. Except as otherwise provided, any appeal of the decision to deny or reduce funding shall be made in accordance with the appeal process established by the Cal OES. The appeal process shall allow a SASP a minimum of 30 days to appeal after a decision to deny or reduce funding. All pending appeals shall be resolved before final funding decisions are reached.

(J) It is the intent of the Legislature that priority for additional funds that become available be given to currently funded, new, or previously unfunded SASPs for expansion of services. However, the Cal OES may determine when expansion is needed to accommodate underserved
 or unserved areas. If supplemental funding is unavailable, the Cal OES shall have the authority to lower the base level of grants to all currently funded SASPs in order to provide funding for currently funded, new, or previously unfunded SASPs that will provide services in underserved or unserved areas. However, to the extent reasonable, funding reductions shall be reduced proportionately among all currently funded SASPs. After the amount of funding reductions has been determined, SASPs that are currently funded and those applying for funding shall be notified of changes in the available level of funding prior to the next application process. Funding reductions made under this paragraph shall not be subject to appeal.

(K) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the Cal OES may reduce funding to a SASP funded pursuant to this section if federal funding support is reduced. Funding reductions as a result of a reduction in federal
 funding are not subject to appeal.

(L) This section shall not be construed to supersede any function or duty required by federal acts, rules, regulations, or guidelines for the distribution of federal grants.

(M) As a condition of receiving funding pursuant to this section, a SASP shall do each of the following:

(i) Demonstrate an ability to receive and make use of any funds available from governmental, voluntary, philanthropic, or other sources that may be used to augment any state funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter.

(ii) Make every attempt to qualify for any available federal funding.

(N) For the purposes of this paragraph, “sexual assault” means an act or attempt made
 punishable by Section 220, 261, 261.5, 264.1, 266c, 285, 286, 287, 288, or 647.6, or former Section 262 or 288a.

(O) For the purposes of this paragraph, “sexual assault services program” or “SASP” means an agency operating a sexual assault/rape crisis center.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 70.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

13838.

“Peer counselor” means a provider of mental health counseling services who has completed a specialized course in rape crisis counseling skills development, participates in continuing education in rape crisis counseling skills development, and provides rape crisis counseling in consultation with a mental health practitioner licensed within the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1357, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. California Crime Victims Fund [13839. - 13839.]

13839.

(a) The California Crime Victims Fund is hereby established within the State Treasury.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys deposited in the California Crime Victims Fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Office of Emergency Services to support crime victim services that are eligible for federal Victims of Crime Act Victim Assistance Formula Grant funding.
 The office shall expend moneys for purposes of this section within three years after receipt of the moneys.

(c) The moneys in the California Crime Victims Fund are intended to supplement and not replace federal Victims of Crime Act funds.

(d) The Office of Emergency Services shall seek advisement from the Victims of Crime Act Steering Committee on the priorities for utilizing the moneys made available pursuant to this section, in addition to federal Victims of Crime Act funds.

(e) Not more than 5 percent of the moneys made available pursuant to this section shall be utilized for administrative purposes.

(f) The Treasurer shall
 provide an annual report to the Legislature on the amounts deposited into the California Crime Victims Fund. A report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 651, Sec. 4.   (AB 2432)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. California Community Crime Resistance Program [13840. - 13846.]

13840.

The Legislature hereby finds the resistance to crime and juvenile delinquency requires the cooperation of both community and law enforcement officials; and that successful crime resistance programs involving the participation of citizen volunteers and community leaders shall be identified and given recognition. In enacting this chapter, the Legislature intends to recognize successful crime resistance and prevention programs, disseminate successful techniques and information and to encourage local agencies to involve citizen volunteers in efforts to combat crime and related problems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1291, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13841.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Community” means city or county governments or portions or combinations thereof.

(b) “Elderly or senior citizen” means individuals 55 years of age or older. 

(c) “Teenagers and young adults” means individuals between the ages of 15 and 24 years of age.

(d) “Community policing” means the coalescing of community organizations, residents, law enforcement, public social services, education, churches, and local governmental entities to unitedly combat illegal drug activity within a designated neighborhood, and create employment opportunity for neighborhood residents. In no case shall “community policing” include expenditures for the purchase of law enforcement equipment which would have been purchased from existing resources in the normal course of business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1419, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13843.

(a) Allocation and award of funds made available under this chapter shall be made upon application to the Office of Emergency Services. All applications shall be reviewed and evaluated by the Office of Emergency Services.

(b) The Director of Emergency Services may allocate and award funds to communities developing and providing ongoing citizen involvement and crime resistance programs in compliance with the established policies and criteria of the agency. Applications receiving funding under this section shall be selected from among those deemed appropriate for funding according to the criteria, policy, and procedures established by the Office of Emergency Services.

(c) With the exception of funds awarded for programs authorized under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 13844, no single award of funds under this chapter shall exceed a maximum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for a 12-month grant period.

(d) Funds disbursed under this chapter shall not supplant local funds that would, in the absence of the California Community Crime Resistance Program, be made available to support crime resistance programs.

(e) Funds disbursed under this chapter shall be supplemented with local funds constituting, at a minimum, 10 percent of the total crime resistance program budget during the initial year and 20 percent in subsequent periods of funding.

(f) Annually, up to a maximum of 10 percent of the total funds appropriated to the Community Crime Resistance Program may be used by the Office of Emergency Services to support statewide technical assistance, training, and public awareness activities relating to crime prevention.

(g) Funds awarded under this program as local assistance grants shall not be subject to review as specified in Section 14780 of the Government Code.

(h) Guidelines shall set forth the terms and conditions upon which the Office of Emergency Services is prepared to offer grants of funds pursuant to statutory authority. The guidelines do not constitute rules, regulations, orders, or standards of general application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 451.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13844.

(a) Use of funds granted under the California Community Crime Resistance Program are restricted to the following activities:

(1) Further the goal of a statewide crime prevention network by supporting the initiation or expansion of local crime prevention efforts.

(2) Provide information and encourage the use of new and innovative refinements to the traditional crime prevention model in localities that currently maintain a well-established crime prevention program.

(3) Support the development of a coordinated service network, including information exchange
 and case referral between such programs as local victim-witness assistance programs, sexual assault programs, gang violence reduction programs, drug suppression programs, elderly care custodians, state and local elderly service programs, or any other established and recognizable local programs devoted to the lessening of crime and the promotion of the community’s well-being.

(b) With respect to the initiation or expansion of local crime prevention efforts, projects supported under the California Community Crime Resistance Program shall do either of the following:

(1) Carry out as many of the following activities as deemed, in the judgment of the Office of Emergency Services, to be consistent with available resources:

(A) Crime prevention programs using tailored outreach techniques in order to provide effective and consistent services for the elderly in the following areas:

(i) Crime prevention information to elderly citizens regarding personal safety, fraud, theft, grand theft, burglary, and elderly abuse.

(ii) Services designed to respond to the specific and diverse crime prevention needs of elderly residential communities.

(iii) Specific services coordinated to assist in the installation of security devices or provision of escort services and victim assistance.

(B) Programs to provide training, information, and prevention literature to peace officers, elderly
 care custodians, health practitioners, and social service providers regarding physical abuse and neglect within residential health care facilities for the elderly.

(C) Programs to promote neighborhood involvement such as, but not limited to, block clubs and other community or resident-sponsored anticrime programs.

(D) Personal safety programs.

(E) Domestic violence prevention programs.

(F) Crime prevention programs specifically geared to youth in schools and school district personnel.

(G) Programs which make available to residents and businesses information on locking devices, building security, and
 related crime resistance approaches.

(H) In cooperation with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, support for the training of peace officers in crime prevention and its effects on the relationship between citizens and law enforcement.

(I) Efforts to address the crime prevention needs of communities with high proportions of teenagers and young adults, low-income families, and non-English-speaking residents, including juvenile delinquency diversion, social service referrals, and making available crime resistance literature in appropriate languages other than English.

(2) Implement a community policing program in targeted neighborhoods that are drug infested. The goal of this program shall
 be to empower the people against illegal drug activity. A program funded pursuant to this chapter shall be able to target one or more neighborhoods within the grant period. In order to be eligible for funding, the program shall have the commitment of the community, local law enforcement, school districts, and community service groups; and shall be supported by either the city council or the board of supervisors, whichever is applicable.

(c) With respect to the support of new and innovative techniques, communities taking part in the California Crime Resistance Program shall carry out those activities, as determined by the Office of Emergency Services, that conform to local needs and are consistent with available expertise and resources. These techniques may include, but are not limited to, community policing programs or activities involving the
 following:

(1) Programs to reinforce the security of “latchkey” children, including neighborhood monitoring, special contact telephone numbers, emergency procedure training for the children, daily telephone checks for the children’s well-being, and assistance in developing safe alternatives to unsupervised conditions for children.

(2) Programs dedicated to educating parents in procedures designed to do all of the following:

(A) Minimize or prevent the abduction of children.

(B) Assist children in understanding the risk of child abduction.

(C) Maximize the recovery of abducted children.

(3) Programs devoted to developing automated systems for monitoring and tracking crimes within organized neighborhoods.

(4) Programs devoted to developing timely “feedback mechanisms” whose goals would be to alert residents to new crime problems and to reinforce household participation in neighborhood security organizations.

(5) Programs devoted to creating and packaging special crime prevention approaches tailored to the special needs and characteristics of California’s cultural and ethnic minorities.

(6) Research into the effectiveness of local crime prevention efforts including the relationships between crime prevention activities, participants’ economic and
 demographic characteristics, project costs, local or regional crime rate, and law enforcement planning and staff deployment.

(7) Programs devoted to crime and delinquency prevention through the establishment of partnership initiatives utilizing elderly and juvenile volunteers.

(d) All approved programs shall utilize volunteers to assist in implementing and conducting community crime resistance programs. Programs providing elderly crime prevention programs shall recruit senior citizens to assist in providing services.

(e) Programs funded pursuant to this chapter shall demonstrate a commitment to support citizen involvement with local funds after the program has been developed and implemented with state moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 452.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

13845.

Selection of communities to receive funding shall include consideration of, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) Compliance with subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 13844.

(2) The rate of reported crime, by type, including, but not limited to, the seven major offenses, in the community making the application.

(3) The number of elderly citizens residing in the community compared to the degree of service to be offered by the program for the elderly population.

(4) The number and ratio of elderly crime victims compared to the total senior citizen population in that community.

(5) The number of teenagers and young adults residing in the community.

(6) The number and ratio of crimes committed by teenagers and young adults.

(7) The proportion of families with an income below the federally established poverty level in the community.

(8) The proportion of non-English-speaking citizens in the community.

(9) The display of efforts of cooperation between the community and their local law enforcement agency in dealing with the crime problem.

(10) Demonstrated effort on the part of the applicant to show how funds that may be awarded under this program may be coordinated or consolidated with other local, state or federal funds available for the activities set forth in Section 13844.

(11) Applicant must be a city or county government, or portion or combinations thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1462, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13845.5.

Notwithstanding Section 13845, the selection of communities to receive funding pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 13844 shall include consideration of, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) The rate of reported drug crime within the community making the application.

(b) The degree to which the program proposes to empower the people within the targeted neighborhoods to combat drug crime.

(c) The display of efforts of cooperation between the community and its local law enforcement agency in dealing with the drug crime problem.

(d) The commitment of the targeted neighborhoods to fight the drug problem.
